nl: Compatibel thermostaat type: Compatibel met high-flow thermostaat; Compatibel met inline-thermostaat; Geen thermostaatvoorziening; Compatibel met externe thermostaat; Standaard autothermostaat (OEM-stijl); Overige
en: Compatible thermostat type: High-flow thermostat compatible; Inline thermostat compatible; No thermostat provision; Remote thermostat compatible; Standard automotive thermostat (OEM style); Other
nb: Kompatibel termostattype: Kompatibel med high-flow-termostat; Kompatibel med inline-termostat; Ingen termostattilpasning; Kompatibel med ekstern termostat; Standard biltermostat (OEM-stil); Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de termostato compatível: Compatível com termostato de alto fluxo; Compatível com termostato em linha; Sem suporte a termostato; Compatível com termostato remoto; Termostato automotivo padrão (estilo original); Outro
ro-RO: Tip de termostat compatibil: Compatibil cu termostat cu debit mare (high-flow); Compatibil cu termostat pe fir (inline); Fără prevedere pentru termostat; Compatibil cu termostat extern (remote); Termostat auto standard (tip OEM); Altele
fi: Yhteensopiva termostaatin tyyppi: High-flow-termostaatin kanssa yhteensopiva; Inline-termostaatin kanssa yhteensopiva; Ei termostaattivalmiutta; Etätermostaatin kanssa yhteensopiva; Vakio autotermostaatti (OEM-tyyppi); Muu
ko: 호환 온도조절기 유형: 고유량 온도 조절기 호환; 인라인 온도 조절기 호환; 온도 조절기 미제공; 원격 온도 조절기 호환; 표준 자동차 온도 조절기(OEM 스타일); 기타
hu: Kompatibilis termosztáttípus: Nagy átfolyású termosztáttal kompatibilis; Csőbe építhető termosztáttal kompatibilis; Nincs kialakítás termosztátnak; Távoli termosztáttal kompatibilis; Szabványos autóipari termosztát (gyári stílus); Egyéb
cs: Typ kompatibilního termostatu: Kompatibilní s termostatem s vysokým průtokem; Kompatibilní s in-line termostatem; Bez přípravy na termostat; Kompatibilní s dálkovým termostatem; Standardní automobilový termostat (styl OEM); Jiné
da: Kompatibel termostattype: Kompatibel med high-flow-termostat; Kompatibel med inline-termostat; Ingen termostatfunktion; Kompatibel med fjerntermostat; Standard biltermostat (OEM-stil); Andet
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta termostata: Kompatibilno s termostatima visokog protoka; Kompatibilno s rednim (inline) termostatima; Nema predviđeno mjesto za termostat; Kompatibilno s vanjskim termostatima; Standardni automobilski termostat (OEM stil); Ostalo
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta termostata: Združljivo s termostatom z visokim pretokom; Združljivo z in-line termostatom; Brez priključka za termostat; Združljivo z daljinskim termostatom; Standardni avtomobilski termostat (v stilu originalne opreme); Drugo
th: ประเภทเทอร์โมสตัทที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: รองรับวาล์วน้ำแบบ High-flow; รองรับวาล์วน้ำแบบ Inline; ไม่มีช่องใส่วาล์วน้ำ; รองรับวาล์วน้ำแบบแยกส่วน (Remote); วาล์วน้ำรถยนต์มาตรฐาน (รูปแบบ OEM); อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibel termostattyp: Kompatibel med högflödestermostat; Kompatibel med inline-termostat; Ingen termostatförberedelse; Kompatibel med fjärrtermostat; Standard biltermostat (OEM-stil); Övrigt
it: Termostato compatibile di tipo: Compatibile con termostato ad alto flusso; Compatibile con termostato in linea; Nessuna predisposizione per termostato; Compatibile con termostato remoto; Termostato automobilistico standard (stile OEM); Altro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ termostatu: Kompatibilné s vysokoprietokovým termostatom; Kompatibilné s in-line termostatom; Bez prípravy na termostat; Kompatibilné s externým termostatom; Štandardný automobilový termostat (štýl OEM); Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de termóstato compatível: Compatível com termóstato de alto fluxo; Compatível com termóstato em linha; Sem provisão de termóstato; Compatível com termóstato remoto; Termóstato automóvel padrão (estilo original); Outro
vi: Loại bộ điều nhiệt tương thích: Tương thích với bộ điều nhiệt lưu lượng cao; Tương thích với bộ điều nhiệt trên đường ống; Không hỗ trợ bộ điều nhiệt; Tương thích với bộ điều nhiệt từ xa; Bộ điều nhiệt ô tô tiêu chuẩn (kiểu nguyên bản); Khác
el: Συμβατός τύπος θερμοστάτη: Συμβατό με θερμοστάτη υψηλής ροής; Συμβατό με εν σειρά (inline) θερμοστάτη; Χωρίς πρόβλεψη για θερμοστάτη; Συμβατό με απομακρυσμένο θερμοστάτη; Τυπικός θερμοστάτης αυτοκινήτου (τύπου OEM); Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilny typ termostatu: Kompatybilne z termostatem wysokiego przepływu; Kompatybilne z termostatem przepływowym (inline); Brak miejsca na termostat; Kompatybilne z termostatem zdalnym; Standardowy termostat samochodowy (w stylu OEM); Inne
zh-TW: 相容的恆溫器類型: 相容於高流量節溫器; 相容於直列式節溫器; 未提供節溫器設計; 相容於外接式節溫器; 標準汽車節溫器 (OEM 樣式); 其他
ja: 互換性のあるサーモスタットタイプ: ハイフローサーモスタット対応; インラインサーモスタット対応; サーモスタット機能なし; リモートサーモスタット対応; 標準車用サーモスタット (純正スタイル); その他
es: Tipo de termostato compatible: Compatible con termostato de alto flujo; Compatible con termostato en línea; Sin provisión de termostato; Compatible con termostato remoto; Termostato automotriz estándar (estilo del fabricante original); Otro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип термостат: Съвместим с термостат с висок дебит; Съвместим с редови (inline) термостат; Без възможност за термостат; Съвместим с изнесен термостат; Стандартен автомобилен термостат (OEM стил); Друг
fr: Type de thermostat compatible: Compatible avec thermostat à haut débit; Compatible avec thermostat en ligne; Aucun emplacement pour thermostat; Compatible avec thermostat déporté; Thermostat automobile standard (type d’origine); Autre
zh-CN: 适用温控器类型: 兼容高流量恒温器; 兼容管路恒温器; 无恒温器配置; 兼容远程恒温器; 标准汽车恒温器（原厂款）; 其他
tr: Uyumlu termostat tipi: Yüksek akışlı termostat uyumlu; Sıralı termostat uyumlu; Termostat yuvası yok; Uzak termostat uyumlu; Standart otomotiv termostatı (OEM stili); Diğer
lt-LT: Suderinamas termostato tipas: Suderinama su didelio pralaidumo termostatu; Suderinama su linijiniu termostatu; Nenumatyta vieta termostatui; Suderinama su nuotoliniu termostatu; Standartinis automobilinis termostatas (OEM tipo); Kita
de: Kompatibler Thermostattyp: High-Flow-Thermostat-kompatibel; Inline-Thermostat-kompatibel; Keine Thermostat-Vorbereitung; Remote-Thermostat-kompatibel; Standard-Auto-Thermostat (OEM-Stil); Sonstige
ru: Совместимый тип термостата: Совместимо с термостатом высокой пропускной способности; Совместимо со встроенным (inline) термостатом; Без гнезда для термостата; Совместимо с выносным термостатом; Стандартный автомобильный термостат (оригинальный тип); Другое